Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-164
Nemaha.

The county of Nemaha is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of section thirty-four in township four, north, of range twelve, east; thence north by section lines to the northwest corner of section three in township six, north, of range twelve, east; thence east by the line dividing townships six and seven, north, to its first intersection with the state boundary; thence around the old channel of the Missouri River and including the land known as McKissick's Island, by the eastern boundary of the state to the intersection thereof with the line dividing townships three and four, north; and thence west by the line to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 37, p. 219;

R.S.1913, § 879;

C.S.1922, § 781;

C.S.1929, § 25-168;

R.S.1943, § 22-164;

Laws 1998, LB 59, § 1.